Utah statutes.
26-31-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Blood" means human blood.

(2)  "Blood product" includes:

(a)  whole blood;

(b)  blood plasma;

(c)  a blood derivative;

(d)  blood platelets; and

(e)  blood clotting agents.



Enacted by Chapter 90, 2011 General Session

